New York, session 2025-2026, A5328.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 65 of the public service law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 17 to read as follows: 3 17. No company that provides electric, gas or any other utility shall 4 impose additional fees related to administrative surcharges, fees for 5 non-use and any other charges to customers over the age of sixty-five or 6 those with a developmental disability, as defined in subdivision twen- 7 ty-two of section 1.03 of the mental hygiene law, and when the premises 8 receiving service is a primary residence. 9 § 2. Section 91 of the public service law is amended by adding a new 10 subdivision 15 to read as follows: 11 15. No company that provides telephone or telegraph services shall 12 impose additional fees related to administrative surcharges, fees for 13 non-use and any other charges to customers over the age of sixty-five or 14 those with a developmental disability, as defined in subdivision twen- 15 ty-two of section 1.03 of the mental hygiene law, when the premises 16 receiving service is a primary residence. 17 § 3. Subdivision 2 of section 89-b of the public service law, as added 18 by chapter 715 of the laws of 1931, is amended to read as follows: 19 2. No water-works corporation shall directly or indirectly, by any 20 special rate, rebate, drawback or other device or method, charge, 21 demand, collect or receive from any person or corporation a greater or 22 less compensation for water, or for equipment or for any service 23 rendered or to be rendered or in connection therewith, except as author- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09181-01-5 A. 5328 2 1 ized in this article, than it charges, demands, collects or receives 2 from any other person or corporation for doing a like and contemporane- 3 ous service with respect thereto under the same or substantially similar 4 circumstances or conditions. Further, no water-works corporation shall 5 impose additional charges to customers over the age of sixty-five or 6 those with a developmental disability, as defined in subdivision twen- 7 ty-two of section 1.03 of the mental hygiene law, when the premises 8 receiving service is a primary residence. 9 § 4. Section 224-b of the public service law is amended by adding a 10 new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 11 3. No cable television company with at least one thousand subscribers 12 shall impose additional fees related to administrative surcharges, fees 13 for non-use and any other charges to customers over the age of sixty- 14 five or those with a developmental disability, as defined in subdivision 15 twenty-two of section 1.03 of the mental hygiene law, when the premises 16 receiving service is a primary residence. 17 § 5. Paragraph a of subdivision 1 of section 399-zzzz of the general 18 business law, as amended by chapter 246 of the laws of 2019, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 a. no provider of telephone, cellular telephone, television, internet, 21 energy, or water services shall impose a fee for termination or early 22 cancellation of a service contract in the event the customer has 23 deceased before the end of such contract, or, when the premises receiv- 24 ing any such service is a primary residence and the customer is over the 25 age of sixty-five or has a developmental disability, as defined in 26 subdivision twenty-two of section 1.03 of the mental hygiene law; and 27 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately.